Nebraska, session 109, LB1225.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1225 LB1225
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 43-274, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-274 (1) The county attorney or city attorney, having knowledge of
a juvenile within his or her jurisdiction who appears to be a juvenile
described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 and
taking into consideration the criteria in section 43-276, may proceed as
provided in this section.
(2) The county attorney or city attorney may offer pretrial
diversion to the juvenile in accordance with a juvenile pretrial
diversion program established pursuant to sections 43-260.02 to
43-260.07.
(3)(a) If a juvenile appears to be a juvenile described in
subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247, the county
attorney or city attorney may utilize restorative justice practices or
services as a form of, or condition of, diversion or plea bargaining or
as a recommendation as a condition of disposition, through a referral to
a restorative justice facilitator.
(b) For victim-involved offenses, a restorative justice facilitator
shall conduct a separate individual intake and assessment session with
each juvenile and victim to determine which, if any, restorative justice
practice is appropriate. All participation by the victim shall be
voluntary. If the victim declines to participate in any or all parts of
the restorative justice practice, a victim surrogate may be invited to
participate with the juvenile. If, after assessment, participation by the
juvenile is deemed inappropriate, the restorative justice facilitator
shall return the referral to the referring county attorney or city
attorney.
(c) A victim or his or her parent or guardian shall not be charged a
fee. A juvenile or his or her parent or guardian may be charged a fee
according to the policies and procedures of the restorative justice
facilitator and the referring county attorney or city attorney.
-2-

LB1225 LB1225
2026 2026
Restorative justice facilitators shall use a sliding fee scale based on
income and shall not deny services based upon the inability of a juvenile
or his or her parent or guardian to pay, if funding is otherwise
available.
(d) Prior to participating in any restorative justice practice or
service under this section, the juvenile, the juvenile's parent or
guardian, and the victim, if he or she is participating, shall sign a
consent to participate form.
(e) If a reparation plan agreement is reached, the restorative
justice facilitator shall forward a copy of the agreement to the
referring county attorney or city attorney. The terms of the reparation
plan agreement shall specify provisions for reparation, monitoring,
completion, and reporting. An agreement may include, but is not limited
to, one or more of the following:
(i) Participation by the juvenile in certain community service
programs;
(ii) Payment of restitution by the juvenile to the victim;
(iii) Reconciliation between the juvenile and the victim;
(iv) Apology, when appropriate, between the juvenile and the victim;
and
(v) Any other areas of agreement.
(f) The restorative justice facilitator shall give notice to the
county attorney or city attorney regarding the juvenile's compliance with
the terms of the reparation plan agreement. If the juvenile does not
satisfactorily complete the terms of the agreement, the county attorney
or city attorney may:
(i) Refer the matter back to the restorative justice facilitator for
further restorative justice practices or services; or
(ii) Proceed with filing a juvenile court petition or criminal
charge.
(g) If a juvenile meets the terms of the reparation plan agreement,
-3-

LB1225 LB1225
2026 2026
the county attorney or city attorney shall either:
(i) Not file a juvenile court petition or criminal charge against
the juvenile for the acts for which the juvenile was referred for
restorative justice practice or services when referred as a diversion or
an alternative to diversion; or
(ii) File a reduced charge as previously agreed when referred as a
part of a plea negotiation.
(4) The county attorney or city attorney shall file the petition in
the court with jurisdiction as outlined in section 43-246.01.
(5)(a) When a transfer from juvenile court to county court or
district court is authorized because there is concurrent jurisdiction,
the county attorney or city attorney may move to transfer the
proceedings. Such motion shall be filed with the juvenile court petition
unless otherwise permitted for good cause shown. The juvenile court shall
schedule a hearing on such motion within fifteen days after the motion is
filed. The county attorney or city attorney has the burden by a
preponderance of the evidence to show why such proceeding should be
transferred. The juvenile shall be represented by counsel at the hearing
and may present the evidence as to why the proceeding should be retained.
After considering all the evidence and reasons presented by both parties,
the juvenile court shall retain the proceeding unless the court
determines that a preponderance of the evidence shows that the proceeding
should be transferred to the county court or district court. The court
shall make a decision on the motion within thirty days after the hearing.
The juvenile court shall set forth findings for the reason for its
decision.
(b) An order granting or denying transfer of the case from juvenile
court to county or district court shall be considered a final order for
the purposes of appeal. Upon the entry of an order, any party may appeal
to the Court of Appeals within ten days. Such review shall be advanced on
the court docket without an extension of time granted to any party except
-4-

LB1225 LB1225
2026 2026
upon a showing of exceptional cause. Appeals shall be submitted,
assigned, and scheduled for oral argument as soon as the appellee's brief
is due to be filed. The Court of Appeals shall conduct its review in an
expedited manner and shall render the judgment and opinion, if any, as
speedily as possible, and in no event later than ninety days after the
date the appeal was perfected. During the pendency of any such appeal,
the juvenile court may continue to enter temporary orders in the best
interests of the juvenile pursuant to section 43-295.
(c) If the proceeding is transferred from juvenile court to the
county court or district court, the county attorney or city attorney
shall file a criminal information in the county court or district court,
as appropriate, and the accused shall be arraigned as provided for a
person eighteen years of age or older in subdivision (1)(b) of section
29-1816.
(d)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (5)(d)(ii) of this section,
any admission, confession, or statement made by the juvenile to a
psychiatrist, psychologist, therapist, or licensed mental health
practitioner for purposes of a motion to transfer a case from juvenile
court to county court or district court shall be inadmissible in any
criminal or civil proceeding.
(ii) Subdivision (5)(d)(i) of this section does not prevent any such
admission, confession, or statement from being:
(A) Admissible in proceedings relating to such motion to transfer;
(B) Admissible in disposition proceedings for such juvenile under
the Nebraska Juvenile Code if the case is not transferred to county court
or district court;
(C) Included in any presentence investigation report for such
juvenile if the case is transferred to county court or district court;
and
(D) Admissible in such case to impeach such juvenile during cross-
examination if the juvenile testifies at trial or during juvenile court
-5-

LB1225 LB1225
2026 2026
proceedings and such testimony is materially inconsistent with a prior
statement made by the juvenile to a psychiatrist, psychologist,
therapist, or licensed mental health practitioner for purposes of the
motion to transfer such case.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-274, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-6-